Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.065

Credentialing by endorsement.

(1) An applicant holding a credential in another state may be credentialed to practice in this state without examination if the secretary determines that the other state's credentialing standards are substantially equivalent to the standards in this state.

(2) The secretary shall write rules to bridge the gap between requirements of national certification of certified professional midwives and state requirements for licensure for licensed midwives.

[ 2014 c 187 s 2; 1991 c 332 s 32.]

NOTES:

Application to scope of practice—Captions not law—1991 c 332: See notes following RCW 18.130.010.